nb: Standard for skinnesystem: H-spor; J-spor; J2-spor; L-spor; Minispor; Universalspor; Annet
cs: Standard kolejnicového systému: H-profil; Kolejnice J; J-profil (2 okruhy); L-profil; Mini kolejnice; Univerzální kolejnice; Jiné
hr-HR: Standard sustava tračnica: H traka; J-tračnica; J2 traka; L traka; Mini tračnica; Univerzalna tračnica; Ostalo
fr: Norme du système de rail: Rail H; Rail J; Rail J2; Rail L; Mini-rail; Rail universel; Autre
sl-SI: Standard tirnega sistema: H-vodilo; J-vodilo; Skladba J2; L-vodilo; Mini proga; Univerzalno vodilo; Druga
es: Estándar del sistema del riel de iluminación: Conector H; Conector J; Conector J2; Conector L; Mini conector; Conector universal; Otros
ru: Стандарт трековой системы: H-профиль; J-профиль; J2-профиль; L-профиль; Мини-профиль; Универсальный профиль; Другое
zh-CN: 轨道系统标准: H 轨; J 型轨道; J2 轨; L 轨; 迷你轨道; 通用轨道; 其他
sv: spåra systemstandard: H spåra; J spåra; J2 spåra; L spåra; Mini-spår; Universalspår; Annat
it: Standard del sistema di tracciamento: Binario H; Binario J; Binario J2; Binario L; Mini binario; Binario universale; Altro
en: Track system standard: H track; J track; J2 track; L track; Mini track; Universal track; Other
sk-SK: Štandard koľajnicového systému: Koľajnica typu H; Koľajnica typu J; Koľajnica typu J2; Koľajnica typu L; Minikoľajnica; Univerzálna koľajnica; Iné
th: มาตรฐานของระบบราง: รางไฟ H; รางไฟ J; รางไฟ J2; รางไฟ L; รางไฟขนาดเล็ก; รางไฟสากล; อื่นๆ
fi: Seurantajärjestelmän standardi: H-rata; J-rata; J2-rata; L-rata; Minirata; Universaali rata; Muu
zh-TW: 軌道系統標準: H 形軌道; J 形軌道; J2 軌道; L 形軌道; 迷你軌道; 通用軌道; 其他
pl: Standard systemu szynowego: Szyna H; Szyna J; Szyna J2; Szyna L; Mini szyna; Szyna uniwersalna; Inne
bg-BG: Стандарт на релсовата система: Шинно осветление H; J–образна релса; Трипроводно J2; Двупроводно L; Минирелса; Универсална релса; Друго
de: Schienensystemstandard: H-Schiene; J-Schiene; J2-Schiene; L-Schiene; Mini-Schiene; Universal-Schiene; Sonstiges
da: Sporsystemstandard: H-spor; J-spor; J2-spor; L-spor; Minispor; Universelt spor; Andet
vi: Tiêu chuẩn hệ thống ray: Ray đèn kiểu H; Ray đèn kiểu J; Ray đèn kiểu J2; Ray đèn kiểu L; Ray đèn mini; Ray đèn đa năng; Khác
el: Πρότυπο συστήματος ράγας: H παρακολουθώ; J παρακολουθώ; J2 παρακολουθώ; Λ παρακολουθώ; Μίνι παρακολουθώ; Universal παρακολουθώ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Padrão do sistema de pistas: Trilho tipo H; Trilho tipo J; Trilho tipo J2; Trilho tipo L; Trilho mini; Trilho universal; Outro
pt-PT: Padrão do sistema de calhas: Trilho H; Trilho J; Trilho J2; Trilho L; Mini trilho; Trilho universal; Outro
ro-RO: Standardul sistemului de șină: Șină H; Șină J; Șină J2; Șină L; Șină mini; Șină universală; Altele
lt-LT: Bėgelio sistemos standartas: H tipo bėgelis; J tipo bėgelis; J2 tipo bėgelis; L tipo bėgelis; Mini bėgelis; Universalus bėgelis; Kita
nl: Railsysteemstandaard: H-rail; J-rail; J2rail; L-rail; Minirail; Universele rail; Overig
hu: Sínes rendszer szabványa: H-követés; J-követés; J2-követés; L-követés; Mini követés; Univerzális követés; Egyéb
ja: トラックシステムの規格: Hトラック; Jトラック; J2トラック; Lトラック; ミニトラック; ユニバーサルトラック; その他
tr: Ray sistemi standardı: H ray; J ray; J2 ray; L ray; Mini ray; Universal ray; Diğer
ko: 트랙 시스템 규격: H 트랙; J 트랙; J2 트랙; L 트랙; 미니 트랙; 범용 트랙; 기타